HunSpellDictionaries/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  9723 Y 1
SFX  9723 ב יבך/64998 .
SFX  7130 Y 1
SFX  7130 0 צתנו/64992 .
SFX  10822 Y 1
SFX  10822 0 צתנו/64993 .
SFX  8098 Y 1
SFX  8098 0 חרר/64992 .
SFX  11001 Y 1
SFX  11001 0 חרר/64993 .
SFX  13042 Y 1
SFX  13042 0 צל/64991 .
SFX  7499 Y 1
SFX  7499 0 יצהו/64992 .
SFX  7676 Y 1
SFX  7676 0 צל/64992 .
SFX  7909 Y 1
SFX  7909 ט יטהו/64992 .
SFX  12904 Y 1
SFX  12904 0 ימתן/64991 .
SFX  9731 Y 1
SFX  9731 0 ימתן/64992 .
SFX  8654 Y 1
SFX  8654 0 בר/64991 .
SFX  5671 Y 1
SFX  5671 0 בר/64992 .
SFX  8753 Y 1
SFX  8753 0 בר/64993 .
SFX  13865 Y 1
SFX  13865 ס צני/64992 .
SFX  11089 Y 1
SFX  11089 ס צני/64993 .
SFX  10148 Y 1
SFX  10148 0 יפונו/64992 .
SFX  5704 Y 1
SFX  5704 0 גנה/64992 .
SFX  13947 Y 1
SFX  13947 0 יפונו/64993 .
SFX  6528 Y 1
SFX  6528 0 גנה/64993 .
SFX  12670 Y 1
SFX  12670 0 ישינו/64991 .
SFX  9405 Y 1
SFX  9405 ח יחוכן/64992 .
SFX  8008 Y 1
SFX  8008 0 גנה/64994 .
SFX  13776 Y 1
SFX  13776 0 ישינו/64992 .
SFX  11799 Y 1
SFX  11799 ס צני/64998 .
SFX  5907 Y 1
SFX  5907 0 ופיכן/64993 .
SFX  13389 Y 1
SFX  13389 0 ישינו/64993 .
SFX  12905 Y 1
SFX  12905 0 ימתם/64991 .
SFX  8943 Y 1
SFX  8943 0 טין/64991 .
SFX  13872 Y 1
SFX  13872 0 טין/64992 .
SFX  10229 Y 1
SFX  10229 0 ישינו/64994 .
SFX  9732 Y 1
SFX  9732 0 ימתם/64992 .
SFX  11400 Y 1
SFX  11400 ה ירם/64998 .
SFX  12802 Y 1
SFX  12802 0 רר/64991 .
SFX  10948 Y 1
SFX  10948 0 טין/64994 .
SFX  5304 Y 1
SFX  5304 0 רר/64992 .
SFX  11272 Y 1
SFX  11272 0 רר/64993 .
SFX  6529 Y 1
SFX  6529 0 בני/64991 .
SFX  11887 Y 1
SFX  11887 0 בני/64992 .
SFX  12122 Y 1
SFX  12122 0 נם/64991 .
SFX  8992 Y 1
SFX  8992 0 בני/64993 .
SFX  5451 Y 1
SFX  5451 0 נם/64992 .
SFX  10973 Y 1
SFX  10973 0 בני/64995 .
SFX  5130 Y 1
SFX  5130 0 נם/64993 .
SFX  12689 Y 1
SFX  12689 0 טב/64991 .
SFX  7794 Y 1
SFX  7794 ט כל/64992 .
SFX  6581 Y 1
SFX  6581 0 טב/64992 .
SFX  11490 Y 1
SFX  11490 0 טב/64993 .
SFX  6372 Y 1
SFX  6372 י ליות/64991 .
SFX  7042 Y 1
SFX  7042 0 נם/64998 .
SFX  8636 Y 1
SFX  8636 0 ודינו/64993 .
SFX  13222 Y 1
SFX  13222 0 וקייך/64991 .
SFX  10403 Y 1
SFX  10403 0 דרות/64991 .
SFX  8507 Y 1
SFX  8507 0 וקייך/64993 .
SFX  7388 Y 1
SFX  7388 ב יבכם/64992 .
SFX  9294 Y 1
SFX  9294 ב יבכם/64993 .
SFX  12755 Y 1
SFX  12755 0 ינייך/64991 .
SFX  7919 Y 1
SFX  7919 0 לויותיך/64993 .
SFX  8586 Y 1
SFX  8586 0 ינייך/64993 .
SFX  8370 Y 1
SFX  8370 0 אינו/64991 .
SFX  11270 Y 1
SFX  11270 0 אינו/64992 .
SFX  9722 Y 1
SFX  9722 ב יבכם/64998 .
SFX  13372 Y 1
SFX  13372 0 ילי/64991 .
SFX  8115 Y 1
SFX  8115 0 אינו/64993 .
SFX  13547 Y 1
SFX  13547 0 ילי/64992 .
SFX  10259 Y 1
SFX  10259 0 אינו/64994 .
SFX  8690 Y 1
SFX  8690 0 ילי/64993 .
SFX  6691 Y 1
SFX  6691 ח יקהו/64992 .
SFX  13189 Y 1
SFX  13189 ח יט/64991 .
SFX  9645 Y 1
SFX  9645 0 ילי/64995 .
SFX  7957 Y 1
SFX  7957 ח יט/64992 .
SFX  10796 Y 1
SFX  10796 ח יט/64993 .
SFX  13271 Y 1
SFX  13271 ה ין/64991 .
SFX  5417 Y 1
SFX  5417 ה ין/64992 .
SFX  11173 Y 1
SFX  11173 ה ין/64993 .
SFX  6472 Y 1
SFX  6472 0 ורים/64991 .
SFX  6149 Y 1
SFX  6149 0 ישן/64991 .
SFX  5516 Y 1
SFX  5516 0 ישן/64992 .
SFX  13883 Y 1
SFX  13883 0 צצי/64992 .
SFX  10206 Y 1
SFX  10206 0 ישן/64993 .
SFX  13135 Y 1
SFX  13135 0 צצי/64993 .
SFX  9081 Y 1
SFX  9081 0 קיי/64991 .
SFX  11919 Y 1
SFX  11919 ח ירם/64992 .
SFX  11394 Y 1
SFX  11394 0 צצי/64995 .
SFX  11243 Y 1
SFX  11243 ח ירם/64993 .
SFX  5961 Y 1
SFX  5961 0 ש/64991 .
SFX  7455 Y 1
SFX  7455 0 קיי/64993 .
SFX  9372 Y 1
SFX  9372 0 ישן/64998 .
SFX  5075 Y 1
SFX  5075 0 ש/64992 .
SFX  9914 Y 1
SFX  9914 ח יתי/64992 .
SFX  7040 Y 1
SFX  7040 0 ש/64993 .
SFX  5906 Y 1
SFX  5906 0 ופינו/64993 .
SFX  12063 Y 1
SFX  12063 ד יד/64991 .
SFX  9370 Y 1
SFX  9370 0 ש/64994 .
SFX  6902 Y 1
SFX  6902 ח יתי/64993 .
SFX  5027 Y 1
SFX  5027 ד יד/64992 .
SFX  11164 Y 1
SFX  11164 ח יתי/64995 .
SFX  9300 Y 1
SFX  9300 ד יד/64993 .
SFX  8988 Y 1
SFX  8988 0 ש/64996 .
SFX  7408 Y 1
SFX  7408 י כלנה/64992 .
SFX  8519 Y 1
SFX  8519 0 ש/64997 .
SFX  11059 Y 1
SFX  11059 י כלנה/64994 .
SFX  12332 Y 1
SFX  12332 0 ישה/64991 .
SFX  8634 Y 1
SFX  8634 0 ודכם/64993 .
SFX  6970 Y 1
SFX  6970 0 ליותיהם/64993 .
SFX  12438 Y 1
SFX  12438 0 הר/64991 .
SFX  5517 Y 1
SFX  5517 0 ישה/64992 .
SFX  10207 Y 1
SFX  10207 0 ישה/64993 .
SFX  6101 Y 1
SFX  6101 0 הר/64992 .
SFX  12121 Y 1
SFX  12121 0 נך/64991 .
SFX  7917 Y 1
SFX  7917 0 לויותיכן/64993 .
SFX  5450 Y 1
SFX  5450 0 נך/64992 .
SFX  9373 Y 1
SFX  9373 0 ישה/64999 .
SFX  5129 Y 1
SFX  5129 0 נך/64993 .
SFX  12971 Y 1
SFX  12971 י כלם/64991 .
SFX  10798 Y 1
SFX  10798 ח טה/64991 .
SFX  9965 Y 1
SFX  9965 ח טה/64992 .
SFX  8906 Y 1
SFX  8906 0 עון/64991 .
SFX  7409 Y 1
SFX  7409 י כלם/64992 .
SFX  10559 Y 1
SFX  10559 ח טה/64993 .
SFX  10019 Y 1
SFX  10019 0 עון/64992 .
SFX  7041 Y 1
SFX  7041 0 נך/64998 .
SFX  8635 Y 1
SFX  8635 0 ודך/64993 .
SFX  6971 Y 1
SFX  6971 0 ליותיה/64993 .
SFX  13221 Y 1
SFX  13221 0 וקיך/64991 .
SFX  7487 Y 1
SFX  7487 0 הות/64991 .
SFX  11060 Y 1
SFX  11060 י כלם/64998 .
SFX  10502 Y 1
SFX  10502 ח טה/64998 .
SFX  8506 Y 1
SFX  8506 0 וקיך/64993 .
SFX  10806 Y 1
SFX  10806 ח טה/64999 .
SFX  7387 Y 1
SFX  7387 ב יבכן/64992 .
SFX  9293 Y 1
SFX  9293 ב יבכן/64993 .
SFX  12754 Y 1
SFX  12754 0 יניך/64991 .
SFX  7918 Y 1
SFX  7918 0 לויותיכם/64993 .
SFX  8585 Y 1
SFX  8585 0 יניך/64993 .
SFX  8369 Y 1
SFX  8369 0 אתם/64991 .
SFX  9918 Y 1
SFX  9918 0 אתם/64992 .
SFX  9721 Y 1
SFX  9721 ב יבכן/64998 .
SFX  8613 Y 1
SFX  8613 0 אתם/64993 .
SFX  13128 Y 1
SFX  13128 ב ירה/64991 .
SFX  7422 Y 1
SFX  7422 ב ירה/64992 .
SFX  12428 Y 1
SFX  12428 0 יכיה/64991 .
SFX  10744 Y 1
SFX  10744 ב ירה/64993 .
SFX  13847 Y 1
SFX  13847 0 יכיה/64992 .
SFX  8265 Y 1
SFX  8265 0 מתו/64991 .
SFX  13582 Y 1
SFX  13582 0 יכיה/64993 .
SFX  9260 Y 1
SFX  9260 0 מתו/64992 .
SFX  9347 Y 1
SFX  9347 0 יכיה/64994 .
SFX  6853 Y 1
SFX  6853 0 מתו/64993 .
SFX  6957 Y 1
SFX  6957 0 יסט/64991 .
SFX  11147 Y 1
SFX  11147 ב ירה/64999 .
SFX  13360 Y 1
SFX  13360 0 ורנו/64992 .
SFX  11554 Y 1
SFX  11554 0 כותיה/64991 .
SFX  6471 Y 1
SFX  6471 0 ורנו/64993 .
SFX  13759 Y 1
SFX  13759 ץ צצי/64992 .
SFX  9327 Y 1
SFX  9327 0 כותיה/64993 .
SFX  8349 Y 1
SFX  8349 0 אן/64991 .
SFX  5502 Y 1
SFX  5502 0 אן/64992 .
SFX  12356 Y 1
SFX  12356 0 דתכן/64991 .
SFX  12120 Y 1
SFX  12120 0 ננו/64991 .
SFX  5354 Y 1
SFX  5354 0 אן/64993 .
SFX  11126 Y 1
SFX  11126 י כה/64991 .
SFX  8899 Y 1
SFX  8899 0 דתכן/64992 .
SFX  5449 Y 1
SFX  5449 0 ננו/64992 .
SFX  5905 Y 1
SFX  5905 0 ופך/64993 .
SFX  7720 Y 1
SFX  7720 י כה/64992 .
SFX  7590 Y 1
SFX  7590 0 דתכן/64993 .
SFX  5128 Y 1
SFX  5128 0 ננו/64993 .
SFX  12934 Y 1
SFX  12934 י כה/64993 .
SFX  12703 Y 1
SFX  12703 0 יטיה/64991 .
SFX  13793 Y 1
SFX  13793 0 יטיה/64992 .
SFX  13514 Y 1
SFX  13514 0 יטיה/64993 .
SFX  11399 Y 1
SFX  11399 ה ירן/64998 .
SFX  10464 Y 1
SFX  10464 0 אן/64998 .
SFX  9468 Y 1
SFX  9468 0 יטיה/64994 .
SFX  7039 Y 1
SFX  7039 0 ננו/64998 .
SFX  13230 Y 1
SFX  13230 0 זרו/64991 .
SFX  10969 Y 1
SFX  10969 0 ננו/64999 .
SFX  10503 Y 1
SFX  10503 י כה/64998 .
SFX  8633 Y 1
SFX  8633 0 ודכן/64993 .
SFX  6969 Y 1
SFX  6969 0 ליותיהן/64993 .
SFX  10086 Y 1
SFX  10086 י כה/64999 .
SFX  6102 Y 1
SFX  6102 0 זרו/64992 .
SFX  5567 Y 1
SFX  5567 0 זרו/64993 .
SFX  11820 Y 1
SFX  11820 ב ובה/64993 .
SFX  7385 Y 1
SFX  7385 ב יבן/64992 .
SFX  9291 Y 1
SFX  9291 ב יבן/64993 .
SFX  12978 Y 1
SFX  12978 0 יתיו/64991 .
SFX  7916 Y 1
SFX  7916 0 לויותינו/64993 .
SFX  10764 Y 1
SFX  10764 0 יתיו/64992 .
SFX  12098 Y 1
SFX  12098 0 יתיו/64993 .
SFX  5066 Y 1
SFX  5066 ר שנה/64992 .
SFX  9719 Y 1
SFX  9719 ב יבן/64998 .
SFX  11535 Y 1
SFX  11535 0 כינו/64991 .
SFX  9023 Y 1
SFX  9023 ר שנה/64994 .
SFX  10079 Y 1
SFX  10079 0 כינו/64992 .
SFX  10018 Y 1
SFX  10018 0 עונו/64992 .
SFX  8905 Y 1
SFX  8905 0 עונו/64993 .
SFX  5667 Y 1
SFX  5667 0 כינו/64993 .
SFX  11111 Y 1
SFX  11111 0 כינו/64994 .
SFX  11985 Y 1
SFX  11985 0 צך/64991 .
SFX  6798 Y 1
SFX  6798 0 צך/64992 .
SFX  5602 Y 1
SFX  5602 0 ציה/64991 .
SFX  7159 Y 1
SFX  7159 0 צך/64993 .
